Nebraska, session 109, LB750.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB750 LB750
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-401 Sections 71-401 to 71-479 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.
Sec. 2. It is the intent of the Legislature to direct the
Department of Health and Human Services to increase the reimbursement
rate for PACE program services to no less than eighty percent of the cost
of care received at a PACE center.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-